test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_lajo_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst


Tests:

  Noun - lajo: # ok LAJO
    lajo+N+Sg+Nom:  laˊj̣o
    lajo+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊjo
    lajo+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊjo
    lajo+N+Sg+Ill:  laˊj̣on
    lajo+N+Sg+Loc:  laajoost
    lajo+N+Sg+Com:  laˊjoin
    lajo+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊjottáá
    lajo+N+Ess:  laijoon
    lajo+N+Par: laijood
    lajo+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊjoh
    lajo+N+Pl+Gen:  laˊjoi
    lajo+N+Pl+Acc:  laˊjoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Ill:  laˊjoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Loc:  laˊjoin
    lajo+N+Pl+Com:  laˊjoiguin
    lajo+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊjoittáá

  Noun - vajo: # ok LAJO
    vajo+N+Sg+Nom:  vaˊj̣o
    vajo+N+Sg+Gen:  vaˊjo
    vajo+N+Sg+Acc:  vaˊjo
    vajo+N+Sg+Ill:  vaˊj̣on
    vajo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaajoost
    vajo+N+Sg+Com:  vaˊjoin
    vajo+N+Sg+Abe:  vaˊjottáá
    vajo+N+Ess:  vaijoon
    vajo+N+Par:  vaijood
    vajo+N+Pl+Nom:  vaˊjoh
    vajo+N+Pl+Gen:  vaˊjoi
    vajo+N+Pl+Acc:  vaˊjoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Ill:  vaˊjoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Loc:  vaˊjoin
    vajo+N+Pl+Com:  vaˊjoiguin
    vajo+N+Pl+Abe:  vaˊjoittáá

  Noun - kulo:
    kulo+N+Sg+Nom:  kuˊḷo
    kulo+N+Sg+Gen:  kuˊlo
    kulo+N+Sg+Acc:  kuˊlo
    kulo+N+Sg+Ill:  kuˊḷon
    kulo+N+Sg+Loc:  kuuloost
    kulo+N+Sg+Com:  kuˊloin
    kulo+N+Sg+Abe:  kuˊlottáá
    kulo+N+Ess:  kulloon
    kulo+N+Par:  kullood
    kulo+N+Pl+Nom:  kuˊloh
    kulo+N+Pl+Gen:  kuˊloi
    kulo+N+Pl+Acc:  kuˊloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Ill:  kuˊloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Loc:  kuˊloin
    kulo+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊloiguin
    kulo+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊloittáá

  Noun - palo: # ? LAJO
    palo+N+Sg+Nom:  paˊḷo
    palo+N+Sg+Gen:  paˊlo
    palo+N+Sg+Acc:  paˊlo
    palo+N+Sg+Ill:  paˊḷon
    palo+N+Sg+Loc:  paaloost
    palo+N+Sg+Com:  paˊloin
    palo+N+Sg+Abe:  paˊlottáá
    palo+N+Ess:  palloon
    palo+N+Par:  pallood
    palo+N+Pl+Nom:  paˊloh
    palo+N+Pl+Gen:  paˊloi
    palo+N+Pl+Acc:  paˊloid
    palo+N+Pl+Ill:  paˊloid
    palo+N+Pl+Loc:  paˊloin
    palo+N+Pl+Com:  paˊloiguin
    palo+N+Pl+Abe:  paˊloittáá

  Noun - njamo: # ok LAJO
    njamo+N+Sg+Nom:  njaˊṃo
    njamo+N+Sg+Gen:  njaˊmo
    njamo+N+Sg+Acc:  njaˊmo
    njamo+N+Sg+Ill:  njaˊṃon
    njamo+N+Sg+Loc:  njaamoost
    njamo+N+Sg+Com:  njaˊmoin
    njamo+N+Sg+Abe:  njaˊmottáá
    njamo+N+Ess:  njammoon
    njamo+N+Par:  njammood
    njamo+N+Pl+Nom:  njaˊmoh
    njamo+N+Pl+Gen:  njaˊmoi
    njamo+N+Pl+Acc:  njaˊmoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Ill:  njaˊmoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Loc:  njaˊmoin
    njamo+N+Pl+Com:  njaˊmoiguin
    njamo+N+Pl+Abe:  njaˊmoittáá

  Noun - ilo:
    ilo+N+Sg+Nom:  iˊḷo
    ilo+N+Sg+Gen:  iˊlo
    ilo+N+Sg+Acc:  iˊlo
    ilo+N+Sg+Ill:  iˊḷon
    ilo+N+Sg+Loc:  iiloost
    ilo+N+Sg+Com: iˊloin
    ilo+N+Sg+Abe:  iˊlottáá
    ilo+N+Ess:  illoon
    ilo+N+Par:  illood
    ilo+N+Pl+Nom:  iˊloh
    ilo+N+Pl+Gen:  iˊloi
    ilo+N+Pl+Acc:  iˊloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Ill:  iˊloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Loc:  iˊloin
    ilo+N+Pl+Com:  iˊloiguin
    ilo+N+Pl+Abe:  iˊloittáá
    
  Noun - himo:
    himo+N+Sg+Nom:  hiˊṃo
    himo+N+Sg+Gen:  hiˊmo
    himo+N+Sg+Acc:  hiˊmo
    himo+N+Sg+Ill:  hiˊṃon
    himo+N+Sg+Loc:  hiimoost
    himo+N+Sg+Com: hiˊmoin
    himo+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊmottáá
    himo+N+Ess:  himmoon
    himo+N+Par:  himmood
    himo+N+Pl+Nom:  hiˊmoh
    himo+N+Pl+Gen:  hiˊmoi
    himo+N+Pl+Acc:  hiˊmoid
    himo+N+Pl+Ill:  hiˊmoid
    himo+N+Pl+Loc:  hiˊmoin
    himo+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊmoiguin
    himo+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊmoittáá

  Noun - humo:
    humo+N+Sg+Nom:  huˊṃo
    humo+N+Sg+Gen:  huˊmo
    humo+N+Sg+Acc:  huˊmo
    humo+N+Sg+Ill:  huˊṃon
    humo+N+Sg+Loc:  huumoost
    humo+N+Sg+Com:  huˊmoin
    humo+N+Sg+Abe:  huˊmottáá
    humo+N+Ess:  hummoon
    humo+N+Par:  hummood
    humo+N+Pl+Nom:  huˊmoh
    humo+N+Pl+Gen:  huˊmoi
    humo+N+Pl+Acc:  huˊmoid
    humo+N+Pl+Ill:  huˊmoid
    humo+N+Pl+Loc:  huˊmoin
    humo+N+Pl+Com:  huˊmoiguin
    humo+N+Pl+Abe:  huˊmoittáá
  
  Noun - pino:
    pino+N+Sg+Nom:  piˊṇo
    pino+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊno
    pino+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊno
    pino+N+Sg+Ill:  piˊṇon
    pino+N+Sg+Loc:  piinoost
    pino+N+Sg+Com:  piˊnoin
    pino+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊnottáá
    pino+N+Ess:  pinnoon
    pino+N+Par:  pinnood
    pino+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊnoh
    pino+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊnoi
    pino+N+Pl+Acc:  piˊnoid
    pino+N+Pl+Ill:  piˊnoid
    pino+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊnoin
    pino+N+Pl+Com:  piˊnoiguin
    pino+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊnoittáá

  Noun - kolo:
    kolo+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊḷo
    kolo+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊlo
    kolo+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊlo
    kolo+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊḷon
    kolo+N+Sg+Loc:  kooloost
    kolo+N+Sg+Com:  koˊloin
    kolo+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊlottáá
    kolo+N+Ess:  kolloon
    kolo+N+Par:  kollood
    kolo+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊloh
    kolo+N+Pl+Gen:  koˊloi
    kolo+N+Pl+Acc:  koˊloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Ill:  koˊloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Loc:  koˊloin
    kolo+N+Pl+Com:  koˊloiguin
    kolo+N+Pl+Abe:  koˊloittáá

  Noun - sino:
    sino+N+Sg+Nom:  siˊṇo
    sino+N+Sg+Gen:  siˊno
    sino+N+Sg+Acc:  siˊno
    sino+N+Sg+Ill:  siˊṇon
    sino+N+Sg+Loc:  siinoost
    sino+N+Sg+Com:  siˊnoin
    sino+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊnottáá
    sino+N+Ess:  sinnoon
    sino+N+Par:  sinnood
    sino+N+Pl+Nom:  siˊnoh
    sino+N+Pl+Gen:  siˊnoi
    sino+N+Pl+Acc:  siˊnoid
    sino+N+Pl+Ill:  siˊnoid
    sino+N+Pl+Loc:  siˊnoin
    sino+N+Pl+Com:  siˊnoiguin
    sino+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊnoittáá
 
  Noun - joto:
    joto+N+Sg+Nom:  joˊto
    joto+N+Sg+Gen:  joˊđo
    joto+N+Sg+Acc:  joˊđo
    joto+N+Sg+Ill:  joˊton
    joto+N+Sg+Loc:  joođoost
    joto+N+Sg+Com:  joˊđoin
    joto+N+Sg+Abe:  joˊđottáá
    joto+N+Ess:  jottoon
    joto+N+Par:  jottood
    joto+N+Pl+Nom:  joˊđoh
    joto+N+Pl+Gen:  joˊđoi
    joto+N+Pl+Acc:  joˊđoid
    joto+N+Pl+Ill:  joˊđoid
    joto+N+Pl+Loc:  joˊđoin
    joto+N+Pl+Com:  joˊđoiguin
    joto+N+Pl+Abe:  joˊđoittáá

  Noun - roto:
    roto+N+Sg+Nom:  roˊto
    roto+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊđo
    roto+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊđo
    roto+N+Sg+Ill:  roˊton
    roto+N+Sg+Loc:  roođoost
    roto+N+Sg+Com:  roˊđoin
    roto+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊđottáá
    roto+N+Ess:  rottoon
    roto+N+Par:  rottood
    roto+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊđoh
    roto+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊđoi
    roto+N+Pl+Acc:  roˊđoid
    roto+N+Pl+Ill:  roˊđoid
    roto+N+Pl+Loc:  roˊđoin
    roto+N+Pl+Com:  roˊđoiguin
    roto+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊđoittáá

  Noun - kođo:
    kođo+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊđ̣o
    kođo+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊđo
    kođo+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊđo
    kođo+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊđ̣on
    kođo+N+Sg+Loc:  koođoost
    kođo+N+Sg+Com:  koˊđoin
    kođo+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊđottáá
    kođo+N+Ess:  kođđoon
    kođo+N+Par:  kođđood
    kođo+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊđoh
    kođo+N+Pl+Gen:  koˊđoi
    kođo+N+Pl+Acc:  koˊđoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Ill:  koˊđoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Loc:  koˊđoin
    kođo+N+Pl+Com:  koˊđoiguin
    kođo+N+Pl+Abe:  koˊđoittáá

  Noun - ito:
    ito+N+Sg+Nom:  iˊto
    ito+N+Sg+Gen:  iˊđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc:  iˊđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill:  iˊton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc:  iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com:  iˊđoin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe:  iˊđottáá
    ito+N+Ess:  ittoon
    ito+N+Par:  ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom:  iˊđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen:  iˊđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc:  iˊđoid 
    ito+N+Pl+Ill:  iˊđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc:  iˊđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com:  iˊđoiguin 
    ito+N+Pl+Abe:  iˊđoittáá

  Noun - ripá: # moved from fadda to the right lexicon
    ripá+N+Sg+Nom:  riˊpá
    ripá+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊvá
    ripá+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊvá
    ripá+N+Sg+Ill:  riˊpán
    ripá+N+Sg+Loc:  riiváást
    ripá+N+Sg+Com:  riˊváin
    ripá+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊváttáá
    ripá+N+Ess:  rippáán
    ripá+N+Par:  rippáád
    ripá+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊváh
    ripá+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊvái
    ripá+N+Pl+Acc:  riˊváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Ill:  riˊváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊváin
    ripá+N+Pl+Com:  riˊváiguin
    ripá+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊváittáá
